Utah statutes.
32A-10-101 (Repealed 07/01/11).   State and local licensing -- Limitations.
(1)  A local authority may:
(a)  tax or prohibit any retail sale of beer;
(b)  issue, suspend, and revoke licenses to sell beer at retail for on-premise
consumption;
(c)  issue, suspend, and revoke temporary permits or licenses to sell beer for
on-premise consumption at temporary special events that do not last longer
than 30 days;
(d)  issue, suspend, and revoke licenses to businesses to sell beer at retail
for off-premise consumption;
(e)  establish proximity restrictions for establishing premises where beer is
sold at retail for off-premise consumption in relation to any community
location; and
(f)  otherwise regulate the retail sale of beer for off-premise consumption
subject to the requirements of Sections 32A-10-102 and 32A-10-103.
(2)  The commission shall issue a license to sell beer at retail for on-
premise consumption as provided in Part 2, On-Premise Beer Retailer Licenses.
(3)  A licensee issued a license for on-premise consumption, by the commission
under Subsection (2) or by the local authority under Subsection (1), is
subject to the operational restrictions provided in Section 32A-10-206, except
as otherwise provided.
(4)  Suspension or revocation of an on-premise beer retailer license issued by
the commission under Subsection (2) or an on-premise beer retailer license
issued by a local authority under Subsection (1) prohibits the establishment
whose license is suspended or revoked from continuing to operate under the
other state or local license it may have.
(5)  The commission shall issue temporary permits to sell beer at retail for
on-premise consumption at temporary special events that do not last longer
than 30 days as provided in Part 3, Temporary Special Event Beer Permits.
(6)  A permittee issued a temporary permit by the commission under Subsection
(5) or by the local authority under Subsection (1), is subject to the
operational restrictions provided in Section 32A-10-306, except as otherwise
provided.
(7)  Suspension or revocation of a temporary permit issued by the commission
under Subsection (5) or by a local authority under Subsection (1) prohibits
the permittee whose permit is suspended or revoked from continuing to operate
under the other state or local permit the permittee may have.
